Massachusetts, session 194th, SD2666.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2B of chapter 639 of the acts of 1950 is hereby amended by striking the first
paragraph and inserting the following:-
The director shall designate certain areas of the commonwealth as “nuclear power plant
areas”. For the purposes of this section, said areas shall consist of all communities located within
a fifty (50) mile radius of any nuclear power plant or inactive nuclear power plant storing nuclear
waste in a spent fuel pool or an Independent Spent Fuel Storage Installation until all the nuclear
waste leaves the site. This designation shall apply whether or not said NNP area is located within
the commonwealth. Such assessments may be made against active facilities, or inactive nuclear
power facilities that harbor spent nuclear fuel, high-level waste, or other nuclear material in spent
fuel pool or in an Independent Spent Fuel Storage Installation until the nuclear waste leaves the
site.
of 1